Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,136
Motor vehicle theft or fraud; notification by insurer.

When an insurer knows the identity of a person whom the insurer has probable cause to believe committed a criminal or fraudulent act relating to a motor vehicle theft or a motor vehicle insurance claim or has knowledge of such a criminal or fraudulent act which the insurer reasonably believes has not been reported to an authorized agency and the suspected person is insured by the insurer, then for the purpose of notification and investigation the insurer or person acting on behalf of the insurer may notify, in writing, an authorized agency of such knowledge or reasonable belief and provide any additional relevant information in accordance with section 44-3,135.

Laws 1987, LB 78, § 3.